Alaska statutes. Title 14. Education, Libraries, and Museums.
Chapter 17. Financing of Public Schools.

Cross references. —

For distribution of state aid to school districts as grants according to the average daily membership for each district adjusted under (b)(1)(A) — (D) of this section for the fiscal years ending June 30, 2015, 2016, and 2017, see sec. 55, ch. 15, SLA 2014 in the 2014 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For state support of schools, see 4 AAC 09.